Hawaii statutes.
§206-40 Purpose of chapter. It is the
purpose and intent of the legislature that other departments and agencies of
the State and the political subdivisions of the State shall do any and all
things necessary to aid and cooperate in the planning, construction, sale,
lease, and operation of development projects by the board or the United States.
[L 1961, c 6, §38; Supp, §98J-38; HRS §206-40]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next